dictsource/lv_rules
     L41J) o (+            o         // o indicators before
           o (L41+         o         // o indicators after
           o (JL41+        o

           o               uo        // words with Latvian roots are more common
           o (_++          uo        // common ending for Latvian words
           o (L40          uo        // usually uo before soft (Latvian) consonants
      L40) o               uo        // usually uo after soft (Latvian) consonants
   L46L45) o (<            uo        // uo prefixes
L46L45L45) o (<<           uo
           o (L44+         uo        // uo postfixes

   //  Prefixes
       _n) o               uo`       // shorter uo for prefix

   //  international prefixes
    _femt) o               o
    _hekt) o               o
    _yokt) o               o
     _kil) o               o
    _micr) o               o
    _mikr) o               o
       _m) ono             ono:
     _nan) o               o
     _pik) o               o
   _stere) o               o:
    _zept) o               o

   //  Suffixes
                                     //  Standard Latvian suffixes
        j) o (L64_         uo
        k) o (_+           uo
           ojo (L64_       uojuo
           o (L86_+++      uo
           ošāk (_         uoSa:k
           otu (_<         uotu
           o (_$w_alt2++   uo        // $alt2 (international) words in lv_list, which are spelled with uo at the end

     L41J) o (lL01_+       o:        //  [fhqxw]..ols
       oJ) o (lL01_        o:        //  o...ols
           o (L62%+        o

      aer) o               o:
      agn) o               o
      agr) o               o
      akr) o (n            o
      akr) o               o
      alk) o               o
     amin) o               o
     andr) o               o
    anekd) o               o:
     angl) o               o
     _ant) o (ņinL04_      o         // Antoņina
      apr) o (L71L05_      uo        // aproce
    arist) o               o
     ater) o               o:
     _aut) o (<            o
     bals) o               uo
    bandr) o               o:
     _bar) o (L12_         uo
      bar) o (L65          uo        // barot
      bar) o               o
     _bar) o (_            uo
      bet) o               o
      bir) o               o
      biz) o (L65+         uo
     blāv) o               uo
       bl) o (ķ            o
       _b) o (L77L05_      uo        // bole
       _b) o (L88L05_      o         // bote
       _b) o (L90L05_++    uo        // boze
        b) o (līL65        uo
       br) o (š            o
     bung) o               uo
     celm) o               uo
      cet) o               o
      cēl) o (L80          uo
     cikl) o               o:
      cit) o               o
       _c) o (_+           o:
   daktil) o               o
     darb) o (L65          uo
      dat) o               o
      deg) o (L65          uo
      dek) o               o
      dem) o               o
      den) o               o
      dep) o               o         // depo.. (zīts/portē/nē/utt.)
     desp) o               o
      dil) o (L80          uo
    dinam) o               o:
     disp) o               o
      _eg) o               o>
      eir) o               o
      _ek) o               o
      eks) o               o
    ekspl) o               o
    ekvin) o               o
   elektr) o               o:
    energ) o               o:
    enL87) o               o
      ent) o (@            o
     epiz) o (L72          o:
      epr) o               o
      ept) o (@            o
      eur) o               o
       ez) o               o>
      gen) o (++           o:
      get) o               o
     glik) o               o
       gn) o               o
        g) o (L66          o:
      gon) o               o
      iez) o               uo
      ilg) o (L80L02_      uo        // Ilgonis
     _ind) o               o
   indukt) o               o
    inkas) o               o
   interp) o               o
     intr) o               o
        i) o (CL01_        o:
        i) o (CL04_        o:
        i) o (CL05_        o:
       ip) o               o
       ir) o (L64          uo
      itr) o               o
       iv) o               o
       iz) o               o
      jān) o (+            uo
        j) o (L90++        uo
        j) o (š+           uo
     kaif) o (L65          uo
     kain) o               o
     karb) o               o
      kar) o (L65+         uo
     kart) o               o
   _kastr) o (L77L02_      uo        // kastrolis
      kin) o               o:
     klib) o (+            uo
        k) o (ķ            o
      kol) o               o
     kons) o               o
    kontr) o (JL56         o:
     konv) o               o
    kript) o               o
       kr) o (L80L02_+     uo        // ..kronis
       kr) o (L80          uo
      _kr) o (nL04_        o:        // krona
      kum) o (L65          uo
       kv) o               o
      lab) o (L65+         uo
     laip) o (L65          uo
     leik) o               o
      lit) o               o
       lj) o               o:
       lm) o               o
        l) o (ģiz+         o
        l) o (ģ+           o:
        l) o (L66L01_      o:
        l) o (L90L05_      uo        // ..loze
       _l) o (žL04_        o:        // loža
      lūk) o (++           uo
    _ļaud) o (nL04_        uo        // Ļaudona
    maest) o               o
      maj) o               o
     makr) o               o:
     malk) o (L65          uo
    marat) o               o:
      mar) o               o
      maž) o               o
      mec) o               o
    merit) o               o
      met) o (L72          o:
     metr) o (@            o
      mez) o               o
     miel) o (L65          uo
     miel) o               uo
     migl) o               uo
      mir) o (L80+         uo
      miz) o               uo
        m) o (L86L14_+     uo        // mosties
      mon) o               o
        m) o (še           o
     nagl) o               uo
     nark) o               o
     neir) o               o
     _nek) o (_            uo
     nerv) o               o
      net) o               o
     niek) o               uo
      nik) o               o
       _n) o (L41          uo
        n) o (L88          uo
           o (ģen          o
    okean) o               o
      okt) o               o:
           o (L50          o
        _) o (ļegL01_      o         // Oļegs
      omb) o               o
       on) o               o
      ont) o (@            o
       op) o               o
     orat) o               o:
      ort) o (@            o
      osm) o               o:
           o (šanL04_+     uo
     pant) o               o
    paran) o               o
     pērk) o (L80+         uo
     pils) o (L80          uo        // pilson
      pir) o               o
     plēs) o (L80          uo
    pneim) o               o:
        p) o (L51          o
       _p) o (L77L02_+     uo        // polis
    polar) o               o
     pomp) o               o:
      por) o               o
       pr) o (L90          o
      _pr) o               o
     prop) o               o
    pseid) o               o
     raps) o               o:
      raz) o               o
     retr) o               o
     riev) o               uo
      rik) o               o
     ring) o               o
      rip) o               uo
     rmat) o               o
       _r) odže (r         oDZ`e
        r) o (L90L05_      uo        // roze
        r) o (z            o
      rtr) o               o
     sark) o               o
     scen) o               o
    seism) o               o
     sērf) o               uo
     sink) o               o:
     skal) o  (+           uo
    skarb) o (_            uo
    skart) o               uo
    skler) o               o:
     slav) o               o
     slog) o               uo
       sm) o (ļ            o         // from Russian
      sok) o               o
        s) o (L77L02_      uo        // solis
      sol) o               o:
      son) o               o
     spid) o               o
       sp) o (L77++        uo
    sport) o               uo
     sten) o (L65          uo
    _sten) o               o
     ster) o               o
    svītr) o               uo
     šalk) o               uo        // ..šalko..
      šan) o               uo
     _špr) o (L88L05_      o         // šprote
     taks) o               o
      tav) o               uo
      tēl) o (L65+         uo
    _tikk) o (_            uo        // tikko
        t) o (č+           o
        t) o (L80L02_++    uo        // ..tonis (uo)
       _t) o (+            uo
     trak) o               uo
       tr) o (L77L77       o         // trollis
       tr) o (L80L02_      uo        // tronis
      _tr) o (L83L05_      o         // trose
       tr) o (n            o
       tr) o (ņ            uo
     tums) o (L80          uo
     turb) o               o
      vab) o (L77L05_      uo        // ..vabole
     vair) o (+            uo
     valent) o (_          uo
     vann) o               uo
      var) o (L80          uo
     vask) o               uo
      vec) o               uo
      vel) o               o
    versm) o               uo        // versmo
    viegl) o (+            uo
     vizm) o               uo
      zil) o (L80+         uo
      žēl) o (L65++        uo
      žir) o               o

.group oa
        k) oa (l           oa
       _n) oa (sL01_       oa        // Noass

.group ob
        b) ob              ob
       gl) ob              ob
        g) ob (e           ob
        k) ob              ob
        l) ob (ē           ob
       _l) ob (ij          ob
       _l) ob (is          ob
        l) oboto (m        oboto
        m) ob              ob
        _) ob (amL01_      ob        // Obama
           ob (je          ob
        _) ob (lig         ob
        _) ob (s           ob
       pr) ob              ob
       _r) ob (ert         ob
        r) ob (ež          uob
        r) obo (t+++       obo
       _r) obo (t_+++      uobuo     // robot
        r) ob (ust         ob
        v) ob              ob

.group oc
        c) oc (a           ots
        d) oc              ots
       em) ocij            o:tsij
        m) oc (ar          o:ts      // Mocarts
       pr) oc              ots
        s) oc              ots

.group od
       an) od              o:d
      _ar) od              uod
      atm) od              uod
      čem) od              od
        d) od (ek          od
        g) od (pr          uod
        j) od (e           od
        j) odo             odo
      _kl) od (L01_        o:d       // Klods
        k) od (L01_        o:d       // ..kods
       _k) od (L05_        uo`d      // kode
        k) od (L51         od
        k) odol            uoduol
     _kum) od (L05_        uod       // kumode
      mel) od              o:d
      mel) od (r           od
      met) odol            odol
        m) od (e           od
       _m) od (L05_        uod       // mode TODO should think how to handle mōda
        m) od (L50l        od
        m) od (u           od
        m) od (us          uod
        m) od (uš          uod
        n) od (L05_        o:d       // ..node
        n) od              uod
        n) odz             uo`dz
        _) od (ai_         o:d
        _) od (as_         o:d
        _) od (ām_         o:d
        _) od (ek          od
           od (erL51       uod
        _) od (esL04_      od        // Odesa
           od (ia          od
        _) odio            odio:
        _) odo (@          odo
        _) odo (s_         uoduo     // odos
      par) od              od
        p) od (e           od
       pr) od              od
       _r) od (erikL01_    od        // Roderiks
        r) odod (en        odod
        t) od (L05_+       o:d       // ..tode

.group oe
        k) oe              oe

.group of
       tr) of (L04_        o:f       // ..trofa
